Washington statutes.
RCW 41.32.8401

Additional payment.

(1) Anyone who requests to transfer under RCW 41.32.817 before January 1, 1998, and establishes service credit for January 1998, shall have their member account increased by forty percent of:

(a) Plan 2 accumulated contributions as of January 1, 1996, less fifty percent of any payments made pursuant to RCW 41.50.165(2); or

(b) All amounts withdrawn after January 1, 1996, which are completely restored before January 1, 1998.

(2) A further additional payment of twenty-five percent, for a total of sixty-five percent, shall be paid subject to the conditions contained in subsection (1) of this section on July 1, 1998.

(3) Substitute teachers shall receive the additional payment provided in subsection (1) of this section if they:

(a) Establish service credit for January 1998; and

(b) Establish any service credit from July 1996 through December 1997; and

(c) Elect to transfer on or before March 1, 1999.

(4) If a member who requests to transfer dies before January 1, 1998, the additional payment provided by this section shall be paid to the member's estate, or the person or persons, trust, or organization the member nominated by written designation duly executed and filed with the department.

(5) The legislature reserves the right to modify or discontinue the right to an incentive payment under this section for any plan 2 members who have not previously transferred to plan 3.

[ 1998 c 341 s 701; 1997 c 10 s 1; 1996 c 39 s 8.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1998 c 341: See note following RCW 41.34.060.

Effective dates—1996 c 39: See note following RCW 41.32.010.